Nebraska, session 109, LB1161.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1161 LB1161
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 43-2101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-2101 (1) All persons under nineteen years of age are declared to
be minors, but in case any person marries under the age of nineteen
years, his or her minority ends.
(2) Upon becoming the age of majority, a person is considered an
adult and acquires all rights and responsibilities granted or imposed by
statute or common law, except that a person:
(a) Eighteen years of age or older and who is not a ward of the
state may:
(i) Enter into a binding contract or lease of whatever kind or
nature and shall be legally responsible for such contract or lease,
including legal responsibility to third parties;
(ii) Execute, sign, authorize, or otherwise authenticate (A) an
effective financing statement, (B) a promissory note or other instrument
evidencing an obligation to repay, or (C) a mortgage, trust deed,
security agreement, financing statement, or other security instrument to
grant a lien or security interest in real or personal property or
fixtures, and shall be legally responsible for such document, including
legal responsibility to third parties; and
(iii) Acquire or convey title to real property and shall have legal
responsibility for such acquisition or conveyance, including legal
responsibility to third parties; and
(b) Eighteen years of age or older may consent to mental health
services for himself or herself without the consent of his or her parent
or guardian; .
(c) Under nineteen years of age who is pregnant or who is the parent
of a child younger than eight years of age or who is experiencing a
pregnancy-related condition, including, but not limited to, complete,
incomplete, or threatened miscarriage, stillbirth, ectopic pregnancy,
molar pregnancy, or other loss may consent to health care decisions for
-2-

LB1161 LB1161
2026 2026
himself or herself without the consent of such person's parent or
guardian. This subdivision does not apply to a person in the custody of
the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to a juvenile court
order; and
(d) Eighteen years of age or older may make health care decisions
for himself or herself without the consent of his or her parent or
guardian. This subdivision does not apply if such person is in the
custody of the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to a
juvenile court order.
Sec. 2. Original section 43-2101, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-